Washington statutes.
RCW 36.55.080

Record of franchises.

The board of county commissioners shall cause to be recorded with the county auditor a complete record of all existing franchises upon the county roads of its county and the auditor shall keep and maintain a currently correct record of all franchises existing or granted with the information describing the holder of the franchise, the purpose thereof, the portion of county road over or along which granted, the date of granting, term for which granted, and date of expiration, and any other information with reference to any special provisions of such franchises.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.55.080. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 42; RRS s 6450-42.]